District of Columbia statutes.
7-863.03

Establishment of Early Intervention Program and Interagency Coordinating Council.

(a)

There is established in the District of Columbia an Early Intervention Program (“Program”) to provide early intervention services to infants and toddlers, from birth through 2 years of age, and their families. The program shall be administered by the Office of the State Superintendent of Education. The services shall be provided in accordance with the requirements of the Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, approved June 4, 1997 (111 Stat. 37; 20 U.S.C. § 1400 et seq.).

(b)

There is established an Interagency Coordinating Council to advise and assist the Mayor with the implementation of the Program, including the establishment of interagency agreements.

(c)

Early intervention services shall not be required under this subchapter, if a minor’s parent or guardian submits in good faith a written notarized statement to the appropriate official affirming the intervention in question would violate the established tenets and practices of the parent’s or guardian’s church or religious denomination.

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-353, § 503, 52 DCR 2331
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 304(a), 54 DCR 4102
Mar. 25, 2009, D.C. Law 17-353, § 203(a), 56 DCR 1117
D.C. Law 17-9, in subsec. (a), substituted “families, which shall be an office of and administered by the Office of the State Superintendent of Education” for “families. The Program will be administered and supervised by a lead agency designated by the Mayor”.
D.C. Law 17-353, in subsec. (a), substituted “families. The program shall be” for “families, which shall be an office of and”.
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 503 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-164, June 25, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 6500).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 503 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 15-2, May 3, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 3782).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 503 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-117, March 30, 2004, law notification 51 DCR 3804).
For temporary (225 day) addition, see § 503 of the Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Temporary Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Law 15-319, April 8, 2005, law notification 52 DCR 4708).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 503 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-3, January 22, 2003, 50 DCR 1426).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 503 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-71, April 16, 2003, 50 DCR 3593).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 503 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Second Emergency Amendment Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-279, December 18, 2003, 51 DCR 60).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 503 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-407, March 18, 2004, 51 DCR 3659).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 503 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Emergency Amendment Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-630, November 30, 2004, 52 DCR 1143).
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 503 of Child and Youth, Safety and Health Omnibus Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-30, February 17, 2005, 52 DCR 2993).